Vermont, session 2025-2026, H295.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 342 is amended to read:
§ 342. WEEKLY PAYMENT OF WAGES
* * *
(b)(1) An employee who:
(1)(A) voluntarily leaves employment shall be paid on the last regular
pay day, or if there is no regular pay day, on the following Friday;
(2)(B) is discharged from employment shall be paid within 72 hours of
following discharge;
(3)(C) is absent from his or her the employee’s regular place of
employment on the employer’s regular scheduled date of wages or salary
payment shall be entitled to payment upon demand.
(2) The final payment of wages to an employee who leaves
employment, whether voluntarily or involuntarily, shall include payment for
any unused accrued vacation leave.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379681 v.1